Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.510

Information and inspections required—Hearings—Confidentiality and disclosures.

All parties to a marketing agreement, all persons subject to a marketing order, and all producers, dealers, and handlers of a commodity governed by the provisions of a marketing agreement or order shall severally from time to time, upon the request of the director, the director's designee, or the commodity board established under the marketing agreement or order, furnish such information and permit such inspections as the director, the director's designee, or the commodity board finds to be necessary to effectuate the declared policies of this chapter and the purposes of such agreement or order. Information and inspections may also be required by the director, the director's designee, or the commodity board to ascertain and determine the extent to which such agreement or order has been carried out or has effectuated such policies and purposes, or to determine whether or not there has been any abuse of the privilege of exemption from laws relating to trusts, monopolies and restraints of trade. Such information shall be furnished in accordance with forms and reports to be prescribed by the director, the director's designee, or the commodity board. The director, the director's designee, or a designee of the commodity board is hereby authorized to inspect crops and examine such books, papers, records, copies of tax reports, accounts, correspondence, contracts, documents, or memoranda as he or she deems relevant and which are within the control:

(1) Of any such party to such marketing agreement or, any person subject to any marketing order from whom such report was requested, or

(2) Of any person having, either directly or indirectly, actual or legal control of or over such party, producer or handler of such records, or

(3) Of any subsidiary of any such party, producer, handler or person.

To carry out the purposes of this section the director or the director's designee upon giving due notice, may hold hearings, take testimony, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses and issue subpoenas for the production of books, records, documents or other writings of any kind. RCW 15.65.090, 15.65.100 and 15.65.110, together with such other regulations consistent therewith as the director may from time to time prescribe, shall apply with respect to any such hearing. All information furnished to or acquired by the director or the director's designee pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential by all officers and employees of the director or the director's designee and only such information so furnished or acquired as the director deems relevant shall be disclosed by the director or them, and then only in a suit or administrative hearing brought at the direction or upon the request of the director or to which the director or the director's designee or any officer of the state of Washington is a party, and involving the marketing agreement or order with reference to which the information so to be disclosed was furnished or acquired.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit:

(1) The issuance of general statements based upon the reports of a number of persons subject to any marketing agreement or order, which statements do not identify the information furnished by any person; or

(2) The publication by the director or the director's designee of the name of any person violating any marketing agreement or order, together with a statement of the particular provisions and the manner of the violation of the marketing agreement or order so violated by such person.

[ 2011 c 103 s 19; 1989 c 354 s 29; 1961 c 256 s 51.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.